Hawaii, session 2026, SB2565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Under section 602-59, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the decision by the Hawaii supreme court to accept or reject an application for writ of certiorari is discretionary.  Under that statute, the court's deadline to decide whether to accept the application is based on when a response to the application was, or could have been, filed. A response to an application for a writ of certiorari may be filed by a party within fifteen days after the application is filed.  When a response is filed early, before the fifteen-day response deadline, the court's disposition deadline falls thirty days after the date the response was filed. Thus, the disposition deadlines for certiorari review will vary depending on when a party files a response or, if no response is filed, when the response was due.  Also, parties can request up to a fifteen-day extension to file a response. When a response is filed early, the court's disposition deadline is also earlier, which results in the court having less time to perform a discretionary review of the legal issues raised by the parties. In addition, the current language of section 602-59(c), Hawaii Revised Statutes, establishing a variable disposition deadline based on when a response is or could have been filed, results in judicial inefficiencies.  Law clerks, court staff, and justices must continually monitor when a response was actually filed, including those filed early; determine if a clerk's extension was granted; or ascertain whether no response was filed by the due date, and adjust the disposition deadline for the cases based on those variables.  For example, in fiscal year 2025, 181 applications for certiorari were filed in the Hawaii supreme court.  For each of these cases, significant judicial resources were spent continually monitoring whether a request to extend the original fifteen-day deadline was granted and whether or when a response was actually filed, in order to determine the disposition deadline.  This use of judicial resources is more appropriately spent addressing the merits of the issues raised by the parties on the application for writ of certiorari. The legislature finds that a fixed deadline for disposition of certiorari review that is not dependent upon whether or when a response is filed would improve judicial efficiencies and would allow the Hawaii supreme court to fully exercise its discretionary authority. Moreover, the public and parties would benefit from a fixed disposition deadline because it would be easier to understand when a decision is forthcoming. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to improve efficiency by allowing the judicial, professional, and clerical staff resources of the Hawaii supreme court to focus on the review of certiorari applications based on a fixed disposition deadline. SECTION 2.  Section 602-59, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  An application for a writ of certiorari may be filed with the supreme court no later than thirty days after the filing of the judgment or dismissal order of the intermediate appellate court.  Upon a written request filed prior to the expiration of the thirty-day period, a party may extend the time for filing an application for a writ of certiorari for no more than an additional thirty days.  A response to an application for a writ of certiorari may be filed no later than fifteen days after the application is filed.  Upon a timely written request by a party, the clerk of the court shall grant one extension of time for no more than fifteen days for filing a response to an application for a writ of certiorari.  The clerk of the court shall note on the record that the extension was granted.  The clerk of the court shall give notice that the request is timely and granted.  A request is timely only if it is received by the clerk of the court within the original time for filing of the response. The supreme court shall determine to accept the application within [thirty days after a response is or could have been filed.] sixty days after an application is filed.  The failure of the supreme court to accept within [thirty] sixty days after an application is filed shall constitute a rejection of the application.  Where the disposition deadline falls on a weekend or state holiday, the disposition deadline shall be extended to the end of the next business day." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 602-59(c), Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall apply in the form in which it read on the day before the effective date of this Act to cases in which the intermediate appellate court's judgment or dismissal order was filed before the effective date of this Act. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request